Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4557.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; ST. PAUL PUBLIC HOUSING AGENCY.new text end new text begin $20,000,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the Minnesota Housing Finance Agency for a grant to the public housing agency for the city of St. Paul and its affiliated entities, including its wholly controlled nonprofit corporation, Capital City Affordable Housing, to rehabilitate, preserve, equip, and repair its deeply affordable single-family home and duplex units. This is a onetime appropriation. new text end